California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) Participants shall maintain a corporation under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code) that shall operate under the name “Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation.”

(b) The purpose of the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation is to provide payments to consumers on eligible claims subject to the requirements and limitations set forth in this chapter.

(c) A participant may not charge or collect from a consumer a separate fee or charge to recoup the fee paid by the participant pursuant to Section 4456.3.

(d) The State of California and its officers, agents, or employees shall not be liable for any act or omission of the recovery corporation or its directors, officers, agents, or employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12202.

(a) The recovery corporation shall have a board of directors composed of six directors, as follows:

(1) One public consumer representative member appointed by the Director of Consumer Affairs who shall serve until the appointment is revoked, another appointment is made, or until the appointed director resigns. The consumer representative shall be either of the following:

(A) A current or former prosecutor with at least two years of direct experience in the civil or criminal enforcement of consumer protection laws, including laws prohibiting deceptive advertising and unlawful and fraudulent practices.

(B) A current or former employee of a government agency who has at least two years of direct experience in one of the following:

(i) The investigation, mediation, and resolution of consumer complaints.

(ii) Providing counseling, information, education, or referral services to consumers.

(iii) Administering a consumer protection program that provides any of the services described in clause (i) or (ii).

(2) A representative of the Attorney General, who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member.

(3) One member of the general public appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules to a two-year term.

(4) One member of the general public appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly to a two-year term, except that the initial appointment to the board of directors shall be for a one-year term.

(5) Two participants, who shall be appointed by the Governor for two-year terms, except that the initial term of the position of one of the participant directors shall be for a one-year term.

(b) A person is eligible to be nominated and to serve as a participant director if the person satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) The person’s primary occupation, at the time of nomination and continuously during the previous three years, has been as an owner or general manager of a licensed dealer or lessor-retailer.

(2) The person has not been convicted of a crime, including a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere.

(3) The person is not subject to a judgment or administrative order, whether entered after adjudication or stipulation, predicated on that person’s commission of an act of dishonesty, fraud, deceit, or violation of this chapter or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) The person is not a defendant in a pending criminal or civil law enforcement action brought by a public prosecutor.

(5) The person has not served as a participant director of the recovery corporation at any time during the previous 18 months.

(c) A director who does not qualify to be a participant director, whose term has lapsed, or who otherwise becomes unable to serve shall not continue to serve as a director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12203.

(a) The recovery corporation shall establish a consumer recovery fund for the payment of claims as provided in this chapter. The recovery corporation shall receive funds from the department as provided in Section 4456.3 and shall promptly notify the department when the recovery fund balance reaches the amounts specified in subdivision (b) of Section 4456.3.

(b) The recovery corporation shall establish and maintain an operations account within the recovery fund for the payment of costs of operations and administration. The recovery corporation shall prepare, before its fiscal year end, an estimated annual operational budget projecting the costs of operations and administration for the succeeding fiscal year, excluding the
 amount paid for claims. The recovery corporation shall not expend more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) each fiscal year from the operations account for the administration of this chapter.

(c) The recovery corporation shall invest all funds received from the department pursuant to Section 4456.3, and interest earned on those funds, deposited in the recovery fund, in a federally insured account or in federally insured certificates of deposit at a California state or federally chartered bank or savings bank.

(d) The recovery corporation holds all money in the recovery fund in trust for the purposes provided in this chapter and shall disburse funds only as provided in this chapter.

(e) The recovery corporation shall separately account for disbursements and collections. The accounting shall include a
 record of each claim paid that indicates the name, address, and phone number of each claimant receiving payment, the amount of the payment, and the name of the participant for which a claim was paid. Quarterly reports shall be provided to the office of the Attorney General, Consumer Protection Section, commencing on or before October 31, 2008, and within 30 days after the end of each quarter thereafter.

(f) The recovery corporation may adopt reasonable written bylaws, rules, and procedures to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The representative of the Attorney General may vote on the adoption of bylaws, rules, and procedures notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 30.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12204.

(a) A consumer may file an application with the recovery corporation for the payment of the consumer’s eligible claim if a dealer or lessor-retailer against whom the claim is asserted has ceased selling and leasing motor vehicles to the general public or has become subject to a petition in bankruptcy.

(b) (1) The application shall be verified and shall set forth all of the following information:

(A) The consumer’s name, address, and telephone number.

(B) The amount of the eligible claim.

(C) A description of the circumstances demonstrating an eligible claim.

(D) A statement indicating the consumer’s belief that the dealer or lessor-retailer has ceased selling and leasing motor vehicles to the general public or has become subject to a petition in bankruptcy and the reasons for this belief.

(E) A statement indicating what action, if any, the applicant has taken to recover the amount of the eligible claim.

(F) A statement indicating that the consumer’s application for payment does not include any amount for which the consumer has obtained recovery under the dealer’s bond required by Section 11710.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a consumer to bring a civil
 action to obtain recovery, file a bankruptcy claim, or file a crime report with a law enforcement agency in order to obtain payment of an eligible claim submitted to the recovery corporation.

(c) The application shall be accompanied by a copy of the agreement between the consumer and the dealer or lessor-retailer, unless the agreement is unnecessary to the recovery corporation’s determination of the validity of the claim.

(d) If the eligible claim is based on the failure to remit license or registration fees, the application shall be accompanied by evidence demonstrating that the consumer paid money or other consideration for the fees, or became obligated to pay the fees, and that the fees had not been remitted. The eligible claim shall be limited to the dollar amount of the license or registration fees not remitted and a late charge or penalty.

(e) If the eligible claim is based on the failure to pay the proceeds of a consignment sale, the application shall be accompanied by the consignment agreement, evidence that the consigned vehicle was sold, and by the consumer’s verified statement that the consumer did not receive the portion of the proceeds of the sale to which the consumer was entitled. The eligible claim is limited to the dollar amount specified in a written consignment agreement to be paid to the consignor.

(f) If the eligible claim is based on the failure to pay the legal owner of the consumer’s trade-in vehicle, the application shall be accompanied by a statement from the legal owner of the amount, if any, that he or she received from the dealer or lessor-retailer. The eligible claim is limited to the dollar amount necessary to discharge the credit balance owing on the trade-in vehicle.

(g) If the eligible claim is based on the failure to pay the lessor of the consumer’s trade-in vehicle, the application shall be accompanied by a statement from the lessor of the amount, if any, that the lessor received from the dealer or lessor-retailer. The eligible claim is limited to the dollar amount necessary to pay the lessor the total amount that the dealer or lessor-retailer agreed with the consumer to pay the lessor.

(h) If the eligible claim is based on the failure to provide good title, the application shall be accompanied by a statement from the legal owner or other claimant of the amount, if any, that he or she received from the dealer or lessor-retailer. The eligible claim is limited to the remaining dollar amount necessary to discharge the valid security interest, lien, encumbrance, or other claim clouding title to the vehicle.

(i) If the eligible claim is based on the failure to pay third parties for insurance, service contracts, or goods or services, the application shall be accompanied by a statement from the third party of the amount, if any, that he or she received from the dealer or lessor-retailer. The eligible claim is limited to the difference between the dollar amount the consumer paid or was contractually obligated to pay to the dealer or lessor-retailer for the insurance, service contracts, or goods or services purchased through the dealer or lessor-retailer and to be provided by the third party and the dollar amount actually received by the third party from the dealer or lessor-retailer for the insurance, service contracts, or goods or services.

(j) The recovery corporation may require reasonable additional information designed to facilitate payment of eligible claims.

(k) (1) For claims that have accrued on or after July 1, 2008, and before January 1, 2009, the application shall be filed within 18 months of the date upon which the dealer or lessor-retailer ceased selling or leasing motor vehicles to the general public or became subject to a petition in bankruptcy.

(2) For claims that have accrued on or after January 1, 2009, the application shall be filed within one year of the date upon which the dealer or lessor-retailer ceased selling or leasing motor vehicles to the general public or became subject to a petition in bankruptcy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 392, Sec. 4.   (AB 501)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

12205.

The recovery corporation shall develop a notice fully explaining a consumer’s right to make a claim from the fund, an application form, and an explanation of how to complete the application. The notice, application, and explanation shall be in English and Spanish and shall be provided to a person upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12206.

(a) Within 30 days of receiving an application, the recovery corporation shall notify the applicant, in writing, that the application is complete or, if the application is incomplete, what additional information is required.

(b) (1) Within 60 days of the recovery corporation providing notice to the applicant of a complete application, the recovery corporation shall either pay the eligible claim from the fund as prescribed in this chapter or deny the claim. A claim shall be deemed granted unless the directors affirmatively vote to deny the claim.

(2) The recovery corporation, for good cause, may extend the 60-day period not more than an additional 90 days to investigate the accuracy of the application or evidence submitted by a dealer or lessor-retailer.

(c) A director shall not be involved in the decision of a claim if the director has a financial interest in the outcome of the decision; has a financial interest in or is employed by the participant that is the subject of the claim; or has a familial or close personal relationship with the claimant or an owner, officer, director, or manager of the participant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12207.

(a) Within 15 days of receiving a complete application, the recovery corporation shall serve a copy of the complete application and the following notice on the dealer or lessor-retailer that is the subject of the claim:
“NOTICE”

“The attached application has been made to the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation for payment of a claim allegedly arising out of your conduct or omission. If you wish to contest payment, you must file a written response to the application that describes any evidence that you have showing that the application is inaccurate or that payment from the fund is not authorized under Section 12200 and following of the Vehicle Code, a copy of which is provided.

“The allegations stated in the attached application may constitute grounds on which disciplinary action may be taken to suspend or revoke your license. In addition, the Department of Motor Vehicles may suspend your license until you have repaid in full the amount paid by the Consumer Motor Vehicle Recovery Corporation on the attached application, plus interest at the rate of 10 percent per annum.”

(b) The notice prescribed by subdivision (a), a copy of the application for payment, and a copy of this chapter shall be served on the dealer or lessor-retailer by personal service or certified mail, return receipt requested, at the department’s mailing address of record for that licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12208.

If the recovery corporation pays the claim, the amount of the payment shall be the total of the amount of the eligible claim, but in no event may the payment exceed thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) for a transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12209.

If the recovery corporation denies the claim, the recovery corporation shall notify the applicant in writing of the denial, the legal and factual bases for the denial, and the applicant’s right to contest the denial in writing within 60 days or any longer period permitted by the recovery corporation. If the applicant does not contest the denial within 60 days or an additional period reasonably requested by the consumer, the decision shall be final. The recovery corporation shall act on the applicant’s objection within 30 days. If the claim is denied in whole or in part, the applicant may seek review in the superior court of any of the following counties in which the office of the Attorney General maintains an office: Sacramento, San Francisco, Los Angeles, or San Diego. Review shall be limited to the written record before the recovery corporation and any relevant evidence that could not have been previously presented to the recovery corporation despite the applicant’s reasonable diligence. The superior court shall affirm the decision of the recovery corporation if it is supported by substantial evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12210.

After the recovery corporation pays or rejects a claim, all of the following apply:

(a) Immediately upon payment, the recovery corporation shall be subrogated to all of the consumer’s rights against the dealer or lessor-retailer to the extent of the amount of the payment.

(b) The recovery corporation may bring an action to recover the amount of the payment plus interest at the rate of 10 percent per annum and shall be entitled to recover costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

(c) Within 10 days of paying the claim, the recovery corporation shall inform the department of the payment of the claim, the amount of the payment, and the name and address of the dealer or lessor-retailer that is the subject of the claim. Upon the department’s request, the recovery corporation shall provide the department with a copy of the claim application and other documents received by the recovery corporation in connection with the claim.

(d) Within 15 days of paying or rejecting the claim, the recovery corporation shall serve the dealer or lessor-retailer that is the subject of the claim with notice of the recovery corporation’s disposition of the claim in the manner provided for service in subdivision (b) of Section 12207.

(e) After the consumer receives payment of the eligible claim from the recovery corporation, the consumer shall not seek to recover the amount received from the recovery corporation for the eligible claim from the dealer’s bond required by Section 11710. Nothing in this subdivision affects any other rights the consumer may have as provided in Section 12217.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12211.

If the recovery corporation has insufficient funds to pay all eligible claims, the recovery corporation shall pay eligible claims in the order that the claim applications were received and shall hold the remaining claims until funds are available to pay those claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12212.

(a) Within 30 days after the close of the fiscal year or other reasonable period established by the board of directors, the recovery corporation shall make publicly available a statement of the following information concerning the most recently concluded fiscal year:

(1) The number of claims and approximate dollar amount of the claims received.

(2) The total number of claims and total dollar amount of claims paid.

(3) The approximate number and dollar amount of claims denied or abandoned.

(4) The dollar balance in the recovery fund.

(5) The dollar amount of fees received pursuant to Section 4456.3.

(6) The administrative costs and expenses of the recovery corporation.

(b) The recovery corporation shall make publicly available within 15 days of approval by the board of directors or other reasonable period established by the board of directors, the following information:

(1) The approved minutes of meetings of the board of directors.

(2) The approved estimated annual operational budget projecting the costs of operations and administration for the succeeding fiscal year, excluding the amount to be paid for claims.

(3) The approved bylaws, as amended, of the recovery corporation.

(c) Information may be made publicly available as required by this section by disseminating the information on an Internet Web site or providing the information by electronic mail to a person who has requested the information and provided a valid electronic mail address.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12213.

The operation of the recovery corporation shall at all times be subject to the examination and review of the Attorney General and the Attorney General’s representatives. The Attorney General and his or her representatives may at any time investigate the affairs and examine the books, accounts, records, and files used by the recovery corporation. The Attorney General and his or her representatives shall have free access to the offices, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of the recovery corporation and may copy any documents of, or in the possession of, the recovery corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12214.

The Attorney General or his or her representative may determine that the recovery corporation has failed or ceased to operate upon a finding that any one of the following has occurred with respect to the recovery corporation:

(a) The recovery corporation was not created.

(b) The recovery corporation is dissolved.

(c) The recovery corporation ceased to operate.

(d) The recovery corporation is insolvent or bankrupt.

(e) The recovery corporation failed to pay its operating costs.

(f) The recovery corporation failed to pay any claim or judgment in a timely manner.

(g) The recovery corporation violated its articles of incorporation or any law of this state.

(h) The recovery corporation invested its funds in violation of this chapter.

(i) The recovery corporation has not diligently made a decision upon a claim made by a person aggrieved.

(j) The recovery corporation violated any section of this chapter.

(k) The recovery corporation neglected or refused to submit its books, papers, and affairs to the inspection of the Attorney General or his or her representatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12215.

If the recovery corporation is dissolved or ceases to exist, or if the Attorney General or his or her representative makes a determination, pursuant to Section 12214, that the recovery corporation has failed or ceased to operate, all outstanding debts, obligations of the recovery corporation, and amounts due for services rendered shall first be paid from the remaining assets, including the recovery fund. The assets remaining, after settling those liabilities, shall be distributed to the participants, less the costs of that distribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12216.

All costs and expenses incurred by the Department of Justice in the administration of this chapter shall be paid to the Department of Justice by the recovery corporation. The Department of Justice may institute an action for the recovery of costs and expenses incurred in the administration of this article in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12217.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit or restrict actions, remedies, penalties, or procedures otherwise available pursuant to any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 437, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. DRIVERS' LICENSES [12500. - 15326.]



CHAPTER 1. Issuance of Licenses, Expiration, and Renewal [12500. - 13020.]



  ARTICLE 1. Persons Required to Be Licensed, Exemptions, and Age Limits [12500. - 12527.]

12500.

(a) A person may not drive a motor vehicle upon a highway, unless the person then holds a valid driver’s license issued under this code, except those persons who are expressly exempted under this code.

(b) A person may not drive a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or motorized bicycle upon a highway, unless the person then holds a valid driver’s license or endorsement issued under this code for that class, except those
 persons who are expressly exempted under this code, or those persons specifically authorized to operate motorized bicycles or motorized scooters with a valid driver’s license of any class, as specified in subdivision (h) of Section 12804.9.

(c) A person may not drive a motor vehicle in or upon any offstreet parking facility, unless the person then holds a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class or certification to operate the vehicle. As used in this subdivision, “offstreet parking facility” means any offstreet facility held open for use by the public for parking vehicles and includes any publicly owned facilities for offstreet parking, and privately owned facilities for offstreet parking where no fee is charged for the privilege to park and which are held open for the common public use of retail customers.

(d) A person may not drive a motor vehicle or combination of
 vehicles that is not of a type for which the person is licensed.

(e) A motorized scooter operated on public streets shall at all times be equipped with an engine that complies with the applicable State Air Resources Board emission requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 630, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

12501.

The following persons are not required to obtain a driver’s license:

(a) An officer or employee of the United States, while operating a motor vehicle owned or controlled by the United States on the business of the United States, except when the motor vehicle being operated is a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in Section 15210.

(b) Any person while driving or operating implements of husbandry incidentally operated or
 moved over a highway, except as provided in Section 36300 or 36305.

(c) Any person driving or operating an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification, as defined in Section 38012, while driving or operating such motor vehicle as provided in Section 38025. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes operation of a motor vehicle by a person without a valid driver’s license upon any offstreet parking facility, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 12500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

12502.

(a) The following persons may operate a motor vehicle in this state without obtaining a driver’s license under this code:

(1) A nonresident over the age of 18 years having in his or her immediate possession a valid driver’s license issued by a foreign jurisdiction of which he or she is a resident, except as provided in Section 12505.

(2)A nonresident, 21 years of age or older, if transporting hazardous material, as defined in Section 353, in a commercial vehicle, having in his or her immediate possession, a valid license with the appropriate endorsement issued by another state or other jurisdiction that is recognized by the department, or a Canadian driver’s license and a copy of his or her current training certificate to transport hazardous material that complies with all federal laws and regulations with respect to hazardous materials, both of which shall be in his or her immediate possession.

(3) A nonresident having in his or her immediate possession a valid driver’s license, issued by the Diplomatic Motor Vehicle Office of the Office of Foreign Missions of the United States Department of State, for the type of motor vehicle or combination of vehicles that the person is operating.

(b) (1) A driver required to have a commercial driver’s license under Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations who submits a current medical examiner’s certificate to the licensing state in accordance with Section 383.71(h) of Subpart E of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, documenting that he or she meets the physical qualification requirements of Section 391.41 of Subpart E of Part 391 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, is not required to carry on his or her person the medical examiner’s certificate or a copy of that certificate.

(2) A driver may use the date-stamped receipt, given to the driver by the licensing state agency, for up to 15 days after the date stamped on the receipt, as proof of medical certification.

(c) A nonresident possessing a
 medical certificate in accordance with subdivision (b) shall comply with any restriction of the medical certificate issued to that nonresident.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 31, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 670, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 2188)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative January 31, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

12503.

A nonresident over the age of 18 years whose home state or country does not require the licensing of drivers may operate a foreign vehicle owned by him for not to exceed 30 days without obtaining a license under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1748.)
-------------------------------------------

12504.

(a) Sections 12502 and 12503 apply to any nonresident over the age of 16 years but under the age of 18 years. The maximum period during which that nonresident may operate a motor vehicle in this state without obtaining a driver’s license is limited to a period of 10 days immediately following the entry of the nonresident into this state except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section.

(b) Any nonresident over the
 age of 16 years but under the age of 18 years who is a resident of a foreign jurisdiction which requires the licensing of drivers may continue to operate a motor vehicle in this state after 10 days from his or her date of entry into this state if he or she meets both the following:

(1) He or she has a valid driver’s license, issued by the foreign jurisdiction, in his or her immediate possession.

(2) He or she has been issued and has in his or her immediate possession a nonresident minor’s certificate, which the department issues to a nonresident minor who holds a valid driver’s license issued to him or her by his or her home state or country, and who files proof of financial responsibility.

(c) Whenever any of the conditions for the issuance of a nonresident minor’s certificate cease to exist, the department shall
 cancel the certificate and require the minor to surrender it to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 974, Sec. 4.   Effective September 28, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

12505.

(a) (1) For purposes of this division only and notwithstanding Section 516, residency shall be determined as a person’s state of domicile. “State of domicile” means the state where a person has their true, fixed, and permanent home and principal residence and to which the person has manifested the intention of returning whenever they are absent.

Prima facie evidence of residency for driver’s licensing purposes includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Address where registered to vote.

(B) Payment of resident tuition at a public institution of higher education.

(C) Filing a homeowner’s property tax exemption.

(D) Other acts, occurrences, or events that indicate presence in the state is more than temporary or transient.

(2) California residency is required of a person in order to be issued a commercial driver’s license under this code.

(b) The presumption of residency in this state may be rebutted by satisfactory evidence that the licensee’s primary residence is in another state.

(c) A person entitled to an exemption under Section 12502, 12503, or 12504 may operate a motor vehicle in this state for not to exceed 10 days from the date the person establishes
 residence
 in this state, except that a person shall not operate a motor vehicle for employment in this state after establishing residency without first obtaining a license from the department.

(d) If the State of California is decertified by the federal government and prohibited from issuing an initial, renewal, or upgraded commercial driver’s license pursuant to Section 384.405 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the following applies:

(1) An existing commercial driver’s license issued pursuant to this code prior to the date that the state is notified of its decertification shall remain valid until its expiration date.

(2) A person who is a resident of this state may obtain a nondomiciled commercial
 learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license from any state that elects to issue a nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license and that complies with the testing and licensing standards contained in subparts F, G, and H of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, a nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license is a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license issued by a state to an individual domiciled in a foreign country or in another state.

(e) The department may issue a nondomiciled commercial learner’s permit or nondomiciled commercial driver’s license to a person who is domiciled in a state or jurisdiction that has been decertified by the
 federal government or not determined to be in compliance with the testing and licensing standards contained in subparts F, G, and H of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) Subject to Section 12504, a person over the age of 16 years who is a resident of a foreign jurisdiction other than a state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or Canada, having a valid driver’s license issued to the person by any other foreign jurisdiction may operate a motor vehicle in this state without obtaining a license from the department, unless the department determines that the foreign jurisdiction does not meet the licensing standards imposed by this code.

(g) A person who is 18 years of age or older and in
 possession of a valid commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license issued by a foreign jurisdiction that meets the licensing standards contained in subparts F, G, and H of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall be granted reciprocity to operate vehicles of the appropriate class on the highways of this state.

(h) A person from a foreign jurisdiction that does not meet the licensing standards contained in subparts F, G, and H of Part 383 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall obtain a commercial learner’s permit or commercial driver’s license from the department before operating on the highways a motor vehicle for which a commercial driver’s license is required, as described in Section 12804.9. The medical examination form required for issuance of a commercial driver’s license shall be
 completed by a health care professional, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12804.9, who is licensed, certified, or registered to perform physical examinations in the United States of America. This subdivision does not apply to (1) drivers of schoolbuses operated in California on a trip for educational purposes or (2) drivers of vehicles used to provide the services of a local public agency.

(i) This section does not authorize the employment of a person in violation of Section 12515.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 295, Sec. 11.   (AB 2956)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12506.

The department may issue a temporary driver’s license to any person applying for a driver’s license, to any person applying for renewal of a driver’s license, or to any licensee whose license is required to be changed, added to, or modified. Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12805, the department may issue a temporary driver’s license to an applicant who has previously been licensed in this state or in
 any other state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or the Dominion of Canada, notwithstanding that the applicant has failed the written examination on the person’s first attempt.

A temporary license permits the operation of a motor vehicle upon the highways for a period of 60 days, if the licensee has the temporary license in his or her immediate possession, and while the department is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the applicant’s right to receive a license. The temporary license is invalid when the applicant’s license has been issued or refused.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 339, Sec. 7.   (SB 838)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

12508.

When in the opinion of the department it would be in the interest of safety, the department may issue, in individual cases, to any applicant for a driver’s license, a license limited in duration to less than the regular term. Upon the expiration of a limited term license the department may extend its duration for an additional period without fee but the duration of the license and extensions shall not exceed the term of a regular license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

12509.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f) of Section 12514, the department, for good cause, may issue an instruction permit to a physically and mentally qualified person who meets one of the following requirements and who applies to the department for an instruction permit:

(1) Is 15 years and 6 months of age or older, and has successfully completed approved courses in automobile driver education and driver training as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.

(2) Is 15 years and 6 months of age or older, and has successfully completed an approved course in automobile driver education and is
 taking driver training as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.

(3) Is 15 years and 6 months of age and enrolled and participating in an integrated automobile driver education and training program as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 12814.6.

(4) Is over 16 years of age and is applying for a restricted driver’s license pursuant to Section 12814.7.

(5) Is over 17 years and 6 months of age.

(b) The applicant shall qualify for, and be issued, an instruction permit within 12 months from the date of the application.

(c) An instruction
 permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall entitle the applicant to operate a vehicle, subject to the limitations imposed by this section and any other provisions of law, upon the highways for a period not exceeding 24 months from the date of the application.

(d) Except as provided in Section 12814.6, a person, while having in their immediate possession a valid permit issued pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of, and paragraph (5) of, subdivision (a), may operate a motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, motorized scooter, or a motorized bicycle, when accompanied by, and under the immediate supervision of, a California-licensed driver with a valid license of the appropriate class who is 18 years of age or over and whose driving privilege is not subject to probation. An accompanying licensed driver at all times shall occupy a